Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
PART 13 Amendment of Articles

7-1-510.
Authorized amendments; articles entirely restated; notice to Secretary of State.

A bank or trust company may, in the manner provided in this part, amend its articles at any time in order to make any change therein which would then be authorized for inclusion in original articles under this chapter, including without limitation an amendment:

To adopt a new name permitted to be used under this chapter;

To renew the term for which it is to exist or to provide for perpetual duration;

To change, add to, or diminish the statement of its purpose or purposes;

To increase or diminish the aggregate number of shares which it has authority to issue or to reclassify the shares by changing the number, par value, designations, preferences, redemption provisions, or relative, participating, optional, or other special rights of the shares or the qualifications, limitations, or restrictions of such rights, either with or without an increase or decrease in the number of shares;

To restate the articles in their entirety;

To change its main office location to a new location; or

In the case of a bank, to become a trust company and, in the case of a trust company, to become a bank, with or without retaining an existing capacity to engage in the banking or trust business as the case may be.

Articles restated in their entirety shall state the street address and county of the current instead of the original main office of the bank or trust company and need not state the names or other information concerning the first directors or the incorporators.

Articles need not be amended for the addition or change of a registered agent or the change of a registered office. The bank or trust company shall, however, notify in writing the department and the Secretary of State of such changes.

History.

Ga. L. 1898, p. 78, § 7; Ga. L. 1910, p. 98, § 1; Civil Code 1910, § 2821; Ga. L. 1917, p. 81, § 1; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 9, § 1; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 10, § 1; Ga. L. 1920, p. 102, § 1; Ga. L. 1927, p. 344, §§ 5, 6; Code 1933, §§ 13-1001, 13-1101, 109-301, 109-302, 109-401, 109-505; Ga. L. 1943, p. 249, § 2; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 240, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 75, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 501, § 2; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, §§ 28, 37; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1045, § 2; Code 1933, § 13-1201, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 964, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 727, § 4; Code 1933, § 109-302.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 525, § 1; Code 1933, § 41A-2301, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 8; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 21; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 9.

7-1-511.
Proposal and adoption of amendments.

An amendment of the articles shall be proposed by adoption of a resolution by the board of directors directing that it be submitted to a vote at a meeting of shareholders.

The resolution proposing an amendment or amendments shall contain the language of each amendment by setting forth in full the articles as they would be amended or any provision thereof as it would be amended or by setting forth in full any matter to be added to or deleted from the articles. A copy of the resolution or a summary thereof shall be included with the notice of the meeting required under Code Section 7-1-6.

Except as provided in subsections (d) and (e) of this Code section, adoption of each amendment shall require the affirmative vote of the shareholders entitled to cast at least a majority of the votes which all shareholders are entitled to cast thereon and, if any class is entitled to vote thereon as a class, of the holders of at least a majority of the outstanding shares of such class.

If a proposed amendment would:

Make any change in the preferences, redemption provisions, qualifications, limitations, restrictions, or special or relative rights of the shares of any class adverse to such class;

Increase or decrease the par value of the shares of any class;

Increase the authorized number of shares of any class;

Limit or deny the existing preemptive rights of the shares of any class; or

Authorize a new class of shares or increase the number of authorized shares of any class, senior or superior in any respect to the shares of any class previously authorized,

the holders of the outstanding shares of such class shall be entitled to vote as a class on such amendment regardless of any limitation stated in the articles on the voting rights of such class.

Any amendment for the purposes set forth in paragraph (7) of subsection (a) of Code Section 7-1-510 shall require for its adoption the affirmative vote of at least two-thirds of all the shares entitled to vote thereon or of each class entitled to vote thereon where voting by class is required.

History.

Ga. L. 1917, p. 81, § 2; Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 9, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1920, p. 102, § 1; Ga. L. 1927, p. 344, § 6; Code 1933, §§ 13-1001, 13-1002, 13-2101, 109-402, 109-507; Ga. L. 1943, p. 249, § 2; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 240, § 1; Ga. L. 1957, p. 501, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 550, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 501, § 2; Ga. L. 1966, p. 463, § 2; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, § 29; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1045, §§ 1, 2; Code 1933, § 13-1201, enacted by Ga. L. 1969, p. 964, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 727, §§ 3, 4; Code 1933, § 41A-2302, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 10.

7-1-512.
Execution, contents, filing, and effect of articles of amendment.

Upon the adoption of an amendment, articles of amendment shall be signed by two duly authorized officers of the bank or trust company under its seal and shall contain:

The name of the bank or trust company;

The street address and county of its main office;

Whether it was incorporated with banking or trust powers or both;

The time and place of the meeting of shareholders at which the shareholders approved the resolution of the board of directors, as originally proposed or as amended, and the kind and period of notice given to the shareholders;

The number of shares entitled to vote on the amendment and, if the shares of any class are entitled to vote as a class, the number of shares of each such class;

The number of shares voted for and against the amendment and, if shares of any class are entitled to vote as a class, the number of shares of each such class voted for and against the amendment; and

The amendment adopted, which shall be set forth in full.

The articles of amendment shall be filed with the department together with:

The fee required by Code Section 7-1-862; and

As soon as possible, a publisher’s affidavit as proof of publication of the advertisement required by Code Section 7-1-513.

The filing of articles of amendment shall constitute an application for a certificate of amendment. If the articles of amendment involve a change in the name of a bank or trust company, it shall reserve the proposed new name under the procedures of Code Section 7-1-131.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2303, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 30; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1366, § 15; Ga. L. 1983, p. 602, § 13; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 9; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 22; Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 11/HB 184.

7-1-513.
Certification of articles of amendment; delivery to bank or trust company; publication of notice.

When the articles of amendment are filed, the department shall certify one of the copies thereof and deliver the same to the bank or trust company. The bank or trust company shall cause to be published in a publication as specified in the rules, regulations, or written policies of the department a copy of the articles of amendment or, in lieu thereof, a statement in substantially the following form:

NOTICE OF AMENDMENT An application for a certificate of amendment of its articles of incorporation has been made by (name of bank or trust company) by filing such application with the Department of Banking and Finance in accordance with the applicable provisions of Chapter 1 of Title 7 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, known as the “Financial Institutions Code of Georgia.” The (purpose) (purposes) of said articles of amendment (is) (are) (state the purpose of each amendment affected by the articles of amendment).

Click to view

The articles of amendment or the statement must be published once a week for two consecutive weeks with the first publication occurring within ten days of receipt by the newspaper of the articles of amendment or statement.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 9, §§ 3, 4; Code 1933, §§ 13-1003, 13-1004; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, §§ 30, 31; Code 1933, § 41A-2304, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 445, § 31; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 795, § 23.

7-1-514.
Approval or disapproval of articles of amendment.

Upon receipt of the articles of amendment, the department shall conduct such investigation as it may deem necessary to determine:

That the articles of amendment and supporting items satisfy the requirements of this chapter;

Where the amendment would grant new powers or status to a bank or trust company, that the criteria for the granting of such powers or status as an original matter have been satisfied;

Where the amendment decreases the capital stock of the institution, that the remaining capital stock will be adequate to support its anticipated banking or trust business;

Where the amendment provides for a change to a new location, that the criteria for establishing a banking office at the new location have been satisfied; and

That the interests of the shareholders, depositors, and the public will not be impaired by the amendment.

Within 60 days after receipt of the articles of amendment, the department, in its discretion, shall approve or disapprove the articles of amendment on the basis of its investigation and criteria set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section. If the department shall approve the articles of amendment, it shall deliver its written approval to the Secretary of State with a copy of the amendment attached and notify the bank or trust company of its action. If the department shall disapprove the articles of amendment, it shall give written notice to the bank or trust company and shall furnish to the bank or trust company a statement generally setting out the unfavorable factors influencing its decision. The decision of the department shall be conclusive, except that it may be subject to judicial review as provided in Code Section 7-1-90.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 9, § 5; Code 1933, § 13-1005; Ga. L. 1966, p. 590, § 4; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, § 32; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1045, § 4; Code 1933, § 41A-2305, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1257, § 11; Ga. L. 1999, p. 674, § 11.

7-1-515.
Issuance of certificate of amendment.

If all the fees and charges required by law have been paid and, in the case of a change of name, if the proposed new name of the bank or trust company continues to be reserved or is available on the records of the Secretary of State, upon the receipt by the Secretary of State of the written approval of the department and of proof of publication of the amendments as required by Code Section 7-1-513, the Secretary of State shall immediately issue to the bank or trust company a certificate of amendment and shall retain a copy thereof along with the approved articles of amendment, the written approval of the department, and the proof of publication.

History.

Ga. L. 1919, p. 135, art. 9, § 7; Code 1933, § 13-1007; Ga. L. 1966, p. 692, § 34; Code 1933, § 41A-2306, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.

7-1-516.
Effect of certificate of amendment.

As of the issuance of the certificate of amendment by the Secretary of State, each amendment shall become effective and the articles shall be deemed to be amended accordingly.

The certificate of amendment shall be conclusive evidence of the performance of all conditions required by this chapter for amendment of articles, except as against the state.

No amendment shall affect any existing cause of action in favor of or against the bank or trust company, any pending action in which the bank or trust company is a party, or existing rights of persons other than shareholders. If the amendment changes the name of the bank or trust company, no action by or against the institution shall be abated for that reason.

History.

Code 1933, § 41A-2307, enacted by Ga. L. 1974, p. 705, § 1.